Utah statutes.
58-17b-611.   Pharmacy records.

(1)  Each pharmacy shall maintain its prescription files and other records in accordance with this chapter, division rules made in collaboration with the board, and federal regulations.

(2)  Each out-of-state mail service pharmacy shall maintain its prescription files in accordance with applicable rules or regulations of the state in which its facilities are located and federal regulations.

